Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-415
Rewards for capture and conviction of horse and auto thieves; powers of sheriffs; limitation on amount.

The sheriffs of the several counties within this state are hereby authorized to offer and pay a reward not exceeding the sum of fifty dollars for the capture and conviction of any person charged with stealing a horse or horses, automobile or automobiles, within their respective counties; and the county boards of such counties shall audit the accounts of such sheriffs for money paid out as such rewards, together with all necessary expenses incurred in the apprehension and detention of any such horse thief or automobile thief, and pay the same out of the treasury of their county.

Laws 1879, § 1, p. 181;

R.S.1913, § 8951;

Laws 1919, c. 139, § 1, p. 317;

C.S.1922, § 9975;

C.S.1929, § 29-415;

R.S.1943, § 29-415.